Wyoming, session 2026, HB0161.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The purpose of this act is to direct a limited,
data-driven study of market-based health insurance
strategies while preserving fiscal discipline and
legislative oversight.

(b) The legislature finds that:
HB0161

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0422

(i) Wyoming's small population and geographic
dispersion contribute to higher per capita health insurance
costs and limited risk pooling;

(ii) Small business owners, sole proprietors,
independent contractors, agricultural producers, early
retirees not yet eligible for medicare, seasonal workers
and rural residents face high insurance premiums and few
coverage options;

(iii) A stable private health insurance market
is essential to affordability without the need to expand
public entitlement programs;

(iv) Other low-population states have used
market-based risk mitigation tools to stabilize health
insurance premiums;

(v) Any evaluation of Wyoming's health insurance
market must avoid new mandates, subsidies or expansion of
public assistance programs.

HB0161

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0422
(c) The department of health, department of insurance
and department of administration and information shall
jointly conduct a study regarding health insurance markets
in Wyoming. The study shall be advisory only and shall not
authorize any program implementation.

(d) The study shall examine, at minimum, the
following:

(i) Whether it is feasible for residents of the
state who are not state employees or officials to have
access to the state employees' and officials' group
insurance plan, provided that these residents:

(A) Pay the full actuarial cost of health
insurance premiums;

(B) Pay all associated administrative
costs; and

(C) Do not increase costs, risks or
liabilities for state employees and officials or taxpayers.

HB0161

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0422
(ii) Whether it is feasible to create a state-
level reinsurance program designed to mitigate premium
volatility in the individual or small group insurance
markets, without imposing mandates, creating subsidies or
expanding medicaid;

(iii) Whether it is feasible to adopt strategies
used or examined by other low-population states that have
implemented or studied similar market-based health
insurance risk pooling or reinsurance mechanisms.

(e) Nothing in this act shall be construed to:

(i) Expand medicaid or any other public
assistance program;

(ii) Create taxpayer-funded health insurance
subsidies;

(iii) Mandate participation in a health
insurance pool or similar program by persons or employers;

HB0161

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0422
(iv) Implement any program without further
legislative authorization.

(f) The department of health, department of insurance
and department of administration and information shall
report to the joint labor, health and social services
interim committee on the findings of the study required by
this act not later than October 15, 2026.

Section 2.

(a) There is appropriated two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the
department of administration and information for the
purpose of conducting the study required by section 1 of
this act, in coordination with the department of health and
department of insurance. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning with the effective date of this act
and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
HB0161

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0422
included in the department of administration and
information's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) Funds appropriated under this section shall be
used solely for:

(i) Actuarial and economic analysis;

(ii) Legal and regulatory review;

(iii) Comparative analysis of other low-
population states; and

(iv) Administrative costs directly related to
completion of the study.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0161